Ohio, session 136, HB883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5164.97 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5164.97. (A) As used in this section, "emergency medical service organization," "emergency medical technician-basic," "emergency medical technician-intermediate," and "emergency medical technician-paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The medicaid program shall cover medical services provided by an emergency medical technician-basic, emergency medical technician-intermediate, or emergency medical technician-paramedic that the technician is authorized by law to perform when the individual receiving the services is not subsequently transported to a hospital or other location, as long as all of the following are satisfied: (1) The request for services was initiated by an emergency call. (2) The individual receiving services was evaluated and treated in accordance with rules adopted by the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services. (3) Either of the following occurs: (a) The technician, in consultation with the technician's medical director or cooperating physician advisory board, determines that the individual does not require transport to a hospital or other location. (b) The individual declines transport to a hospital or other location. (C) To be eligible to submit claims for payment for services provided under this section, an emergency medical service organization shall satisfy both of the following: (1) The emergency medical service organization holds a valid medicaid provider agreement. (2) The services for which payment is sought were medically necessary, and the emergency medical service organization has properly documented medical necessity. (D) The medicaid payment rate for medical services provided under this section shall be one hundred fifty dollars per service. Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 3. 1 2 3 4 5 A MCD DEPARTMENT OF MEDICAID B General Revenue Fund C GRF 651525 Medicaid Health Care Services - Total $0 $2,000,000 D Medicaid Health Care Services - State $0 $551,800 E Medicaid Health Care Services - Federal $0 $1,448,200 F General Revenue Fund Total $0 $2,000,000 G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $0 $2,000,000 The foregoing supplemental appropriations in appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, shall be used only to support the payment rate for in-place medical services provided by emergency medical technicians established by section 5164.97 of the Revised Code. The foregoing supplemental appropriations are intended to provide only for novel expenses directly resulting from the implementation of the payment rate provisions established by section 5164.97 of the Revised Code. Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.